Massachusetts, session 194th, S1548.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 21A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after section 18A the following section:-
Section 18B. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall, unless the context
otherwise requires, have the following meanings:—
“black carbon,” those fine particles less than or equal to 2.5 micrometers in diameter
commonly known as soot.
“department,” the department of environmental protection.
“environmental justice population,” the populations defined in section 62 of chapter 30.
of 6

“HEPA filtration,” a high efficiency particulate arrestance filtration system that removes
at least 99 percent of dust, pollen, mold, bacteria, and any airborne particles with a size of 0.3-
10.0 microns and is equivalent to a MERV 17, MERV 18, MERV 19, or MERV 20 filter.
“MERV 16 filter,” a minimum efficiency reporting value filtration system that removes
at least 95 percent of dust, pollen, mold, bacteria, and any airborne particles with a size of 0.3-
10.0 microns.
“particulate matter,” and “particulates,” a broad class of chemically and physically
diverse substances that exist as discrete particles in air, including coarse, fine, and ultrafine
particles.
“fine particulate matter,” and “fine particulates,” particulate matter less than or equal to
2.5 micrometers in diameter.
“ultrafine particulate matter,” and “ultrafine particulates,” particulate matter less than or
equal to 0.1 micrometers in diameter.
(b) The department, in consultation with the department of public health, shall convene a
technical air quality advisory committee comprised of: residents of environmental justice
populations living adjacent to major highways; academics with expertise in outdoor air
monitoring, environmental health, air toxics, and air pollution; and labor representatives; for the
purpose of identifying communities with high cumulative exposure burdens to toxic outdoor air
contaminants and criteria pollutants.
Said advisory committee shall consist of: 1 person appointed by the Governor with a
background in background in public health or environmental policy, who shall serve as Chair; 2
of 6

persons appointed by the secretary of the executive office of energy and environmental affairs
with a background in public health or environmental justice; 1 person appointed by the Attorney
General with a background in environmental law or regulatory compliance; and 5 persons who
shall be representatives of community-based or environmental justice organizations, 2 of whom
shall be appointed by the Governor, 1 of whom shall be appointed by the Speaker of the House, 1
of whom shall be appointed by the Senate President, and 1 of whom shall be appointed by the
Attorney General.
When making appointments, an appointing authority shall select individuals who are
from, or have experience advocating for, communities that have been disproportionately harmed
by air pollution and environmental injustice.
Any vacancy in a seat on the advisory committee shall be filled by the appropriate
appointing authority within 60 days of the vacancy. The appointing authority may remove an
advisory board member who was appointed by that appointing authority for cause. Before
removal, the advisory board member shall be provided with a written statement of the reason for
removal and an opportunity to be heard.
The department shall convene the technical advisory committee by December 1, 2025.
No later than June 30, 2026 and every three years thereafter, the technical advisory committee
shall identify the likely air pollution hotspots due to high concentrations of traffic- and industry-
related air pollution throughout the Commonwealth that should be equipped with new or
expanded air monitors and establish a definition of “air quality” and “air quality target
pollutants” that includes, but is not limited to, consideration of criteria pollutants, black carbon,
and ultrafine particulate matter.
of 6

The advisory committee shall provide recommendations regarding the installation of air
filtration in eligible buildings located within 200 meters of a class 1, class 2 or class 3 roadway,
marine terminal, airport, or a train station or train yard serving diesel locomotives. Eligible
buildings include: (i) existing residential public housing; (ii) existing residential private
multifamily housing with more than two tenant-occupied units; (iii) existing public schools
serving students of any age in grades kindergarten through twelfth grade; (iv) existing private
schools serving students of any age in grades kindergarten through twelfth grade; (v) existing
charter schools serving students of any age in grades kindergarten through twelfth grade; (vi)
existing college and university buildings with one or more classrooms; (vii) existing commercial
buildings with businesses that have five or more full-time employees; and (viii) existing
correctional facilities, including prisons and jails.
The advisory committee shall identify funding sources to provide incentives for eligible
buildings that are schools, private housing, and public housing to cover the cost of installing air
filtration equipment.
Air filtration equipment installed in eligible buildings that are schools, commercial
buildings greater than 20,000 square feet, and residential buildings with more than 10 units shall
be MERV 16 or other equipment that removes at least the same amount of ultrafine particulate
matter as a MERV 16 filter.
(c) By December 31, 2026, the department shall install and operate stationary air
monitors in at least eight air pollution hotspots that measure for at least one of the following
pollutants: black carbon, nitrogen oxides, ultrafine particulate matter.
of 6

By June 30, 2027, the department shall establish baseline air quality in air pollution
hotspots. Data from the air monitors shall be publicly accessible and provide near-time
information. The department shall work with residents of environmental justice populations to
conduct participatory action research where residents can use mobile air sensors to expand the
number of locations where residents can track air quality. Once those hotspots are determined
and the baseline data is established, the department of
environmental protection shall set annual targets to decrease air quality target pollutants
between 2026 and 2035 to improve the air quality in that location. Air monitoring data shall be
collected every three years between 2026 and 2035 to measure progress toward achieving air
quality target pollutants reduction targets and make such data publicly available.
By December 31, 2030, the department shall ensure that air pollution hotspots achieve air
quality target pollutant concentrations that are at least 50 percent below the baseline in each
hotspot and certify as such by publicly reporting compliance.
By December 31, 2035, the department shall ensure that air quality target pollutants
concentrations in hotspots are at least 75 percent below the baseline in each hotspot and certify
as such by publicly reporting compliance.
(d) The provisions of this section may be enforced by means of an action in the superior
court seeking either injunctive relief, a declaratory judgment, a writ of mandamus or any
combination thereof. No such action may be commenced without the plaintiff providing written
notice of the violations of this chapter to defendants at least 60 days prior to filing a legal action
in superior court. All persons shall have standing to commence such enforcement actions.
of 6

Reasonable attorneys’ fees shall be recoverable by all substantially prevailing plaintiffs who seek
relief under this section.
of 6